Washington statutes.
RCW 41.32.855

Application for and effective date of retirement allowances.

Any member or beneficiary eligible to receive a retirement allowance under the provisions of RCW 41.32.875, 41.32.880, or 41.32.895 shall be eligible to commence receiving a retirement allowance after having filed written application with the department.

(1) Retirement allowances paid to members shall accrue from the first day of the calendar month immediately following such member's separation from employment.

(2) Retirement allowances payable to eligible members no longer in service, but qualifying for such an allowance pursuant to RCW 41.32.875 shall accrue from the first day of the calendar month immediately following such qualification.

(3) Disability allowances paid to disabled members shall accrue from the first day of the calendar month immediately following such member's separation from employment for disability.

(4) Retirement allowances paid as death benefits shall accrue from the first day of the calendar month immediately following the member's death.

[ 1996 c 39 s 5; 1995 c 239 s 109.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—1996 c 39: See note following RCW 41.32.010.

Intent—Purpose—1995 c 239: See note following RCW 41.32.831.

Effective date—Part and subchapter headings not law—1995 c 239: See notes following RCW 41.32.005.

Benefits not contractual right until date specified: RCW 41.34.100.